Hawaii statutes.
[§200-17] Designated slip for Coast Guard
auxiliary. (a) The department may designate one boat slip, that is not
contiguous to the United States Coast Guard, in each harbor to be dedicated to
a Coast Guard auxiliary vessel and designated as an auxiliary operational
facility. The slip shall be occupied by a Coast Guard auxiliary vessel that
shall be equipped and operated to answer emergency search and rescue calls.
The Coast Guard shall pay the regular slip rate.

(b) The department may adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 in consultation with the United States Coast Guard to implement this
section. [L 1995, c 86, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next